en: Squeezed pineapple juices, Non-refrigerated squeezed pineapple juices
de: Ananasdirektsäfte
es: Zumos de piña exprimidos no refrigerados, Zumos de piña exprimidos, Zumos de piña exprimidos ambiente
fi: puristetut ananasmehut
fr: Jus d'ananas pur jus, pur jus d'ananas
hr: Cijeđeni sokovi od ananasa
hu: Préselt ananászlevek
lt: Išspaustų ananasų sultys
nl: Vers geperste ananassappen, Vers geperst ananassap

en: Refrigerated squeezed pineapple juices
de: Gekühlte Ananasdirektsäfte, Gekühlter gepresster Ananassaft
es: Zumos de piña exprimidos refrigerados
fr: Jus d'ananas frais
hr: Ohlađeni cijeđeni sokovi od ananasa
nl: Verse Ananassappen, Verse Ananassap

en: Prune juices, Prune juice, Plum juices
bg: Сок от сливи
de: Pflaumensäfte, Backpflaumensäfte, Dörrpflaumensäfte
es: Zumos de ciruela
fi: luumumehu
fr: Jus de pruneaux, Jus de prune, jus de prunes
hr: Sokovi od suhih šljiva
hu: Szilvalevek, Szilvalé
it: Succo di prugna
ja: プルーンジュース
lt: Slyvų sultys, Džiovintų slyvų sultys
nl: Pruimensappen, Pruimensap, Pruimedantensappen, Pruimedantensap
pl: Soki śliwkowe

en: Plum juices from concentrate
bg: Сок от слива от концентрат
de: Pflaumensäfte aus Konzentrat
es: Zumos de ciruela procedente de concentrado
fr: Jus de prune à base de concentré, jus de prunes à base de concentré
hr: Sokovi od šljiva iz koncentrata
it: Succo di prugna da concentrato
ja: プラムジュース（濃縮）
lt: Koncentruotos slyvų sultys, Slyvų sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Pruimensappen uit concentraat, Pruimensap uit concentraat
pl: Soki śliwkowe z koncentratu
zh: 李子汁（浓缩）

en: Squeezed plum juices, Non-refrigerated squeezed plum juices
de: Pflaumendirektsäfte
es: Zumos de ciruela exprimidos no refrigerados, Zumos de ciruela exprimidos, Zumos de ciruela exprimidos ambiente
fr: Jus de prune frais
hr: Cijeđene sokove od šljiva
nl: Verse pruimensappen, Verse pruimensap

en: Pomegranate juices
bg: Сок от нар
de: Granatapfelsäfte
es: Zumos de granada
fi: Granaattiomenamehu
fr: Jus de grenade, jus de grenades
hr: Sokovi od nara
hu: Gránátalmalé
it: Succo di melograno
ja: ザクロジュース
lt: Granatų sultys, Granatų vaisių sultys
nl: Granaatappelsappen, Granaatappelsap
pl: Soki z granatu
ru: Сок гранатовый, Гранатовый сок

en: Fresh pomegranate juice
de: Frischer Granatapfelsaft
es: Zumo de granada fresco
fr: Jus de grenade frais
hr: Svježi sok od nara
lt: Šviežios granatų sultys
nl: Verse granaatappelsappen, Verse granaatappelsap

en: Pomegranate juices from concentrate
de: Granatapfelsäfte aus Konzentrat
es: Zumos de granada procedente de concentrado
fr: Jus de grenade à base de concentré, jus de grenades à base de concentré
hr: Sokovi od nara iz koncentrata
lt: Koncentruotos granatų sultys, Granatų sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Granaatappelsappen uit concentraat, Granaatappelsap uit concentraat

en: Squeezed pomegranate juices, Non-refrigerated squeezed pomegranate juices
de: Granatapfeldirektsäfte
es: Zumos de granada exprimidos no refrigerados, Zumos de granada exprimidos, Zumos de granada exprimidos ambiente
fr: Jus de grenade pur jus
hr: Cijeđeni sokovi od nara
nl: Geperst granaatappelsap

en: Refrigerated squeezed juices, Fresh fruit juices
de: Gekühlte Direktsäfte
es: Zumos exprimidos refrigerados
fi: jäähdytetyt puristetut mehut
fr: Jus de fruits frais
hr: Ohlađeni cijeđeni sokovi
hu: Hidegen préselt gyümölcslevek
lt: Šviežių vaisių sultys
nl: Gekoelde verse vruchtensappen, Gekoelde verse vruchtensap

en: Squeezed fruit juices, squeezed juices, Non-refrigerated squeezed juices, Pure fruit juices
ca: Sucs expremuts, sucs espremuts no refrigerats
de: Direktsäfte, Ungekühlte Direktsäfte
es: Zumos exprimidos no refrigerados, Zumos exprimidos, Zumos exprimidos ambiente, Zumos exprimidos a temperatura ambiente
fi: puristetut mehut
fr: Jus de fruits pur jus, jus de fruits 100% pur jus, jus de fruit 100% pur jus, jus de fruit pur jus, pur jus de fruits
he: מיצים סחוטים
hr: Cijeđeni sokovi
hu: Préselt gyümöcslevek, Facsart gyümölcslevek, Préselt gyümölcslé
lt: Grynos vaisių sultys, spaustos sultys
nl: Verse ongekoelde vruchtensappen, Verse ongekoelde vruchtensap
pl: Świeżo wyciskane soki
pt: Sumos espremidos
ru: Свежевыжатые соки
zh: 鲜榨果汁

en: Tangerine juices
bg: Сок от мандарини
de: Mandarinensäfte
es: Zumos de mandarina
fr: Jus de mandarine, jus de mandarines
hr: Sokovi od mandarina
hu: Mandarinlevek, Mandarinlé
lt: Mandarinų sultys
nl: Mandarijnensappen, Mandarijnensap
ro: Suc de mandarine, Suc cu mandarine
zh: 橘子汁, 柑橘汁

en: Tangerine juices from concentrate
de: Mandarinensäfte aus Konzentrat
es: Zumos de mandarina procedente de concentrado, Zumos de clementina procedente de concentrado
fr: Jus de mandarine à base de concentré
hr: Sokovi mandarina iz koncentrata
hu: Mandarinlé koncentrátumból
lt: Koncentruotos mandarinų sultys, Mandarinų sultys iš koncentrato
nl: Manderijnensappen uit concentraat, Manderijnensap uit concentraat

en: Refrigerated squeezed tangerine juices
de: Gekühlte Mandarinendirektsäfte
es: Zumos de mandarina exprimidos refrigerados, Zumos de clementina exprimidos refrigerados
fr: Jus de mandarine pur jus frais
hr: Ohlađeni cijeđeni sokovi mandarina
nl: Gekoelde geperste mandarijnensappen, Gekoeld geperst mandarijnensap

en: Squeezed tangerine juices, Non-refrigerated squeezed tangerine juices
de: Mandarinendirektsäfte
es: Zumos de mandarina exprimidos no refrigerados, Zumos de mandarina exprimidos, Zumos de mandarina exprimidos ambiente, Zumos de clementina exprimidos no refrigerados, Zumos de clementina exprimidos, Zumos de clementina exprimidos ambiente
fr: Jus de mandarine pur jus
hr: Cijeđene sokove mandarine
nl: Vers geperste mandarijnensappen, Vers geperste mandarijnensap

en: Beverages from desugared fruit juices
de: Getränke aus entzuckerten Fruchtsäften
es: Bebidas a base de jugos de frutas sin azúcar
fr: Boissons à base de jus de fruits désucrés
hr: Napitci od voćnih sokova bez šećera
hu: Cukormentesített gyümölcslevekből készült italok
it: Bevande a base di succhi di frutta senza zucchero
nl: Dranken op basis van ongezoete vruchtensappen

en: Fruit nectars, Nectars
bg: Плодови нектари, Нектари
ca: Nèctars de fruita, Nèctars
de: Fruchtnektare, Frucht-Nektare
es: Néctares de frutas, Néctares
fi: Hedelmänektarit
fr: Nectars de fruits, nectar de fruits, nectars, nectar
he: נקטר פירות
hr: Voćni nektari
hu: Gyümölcsnektárok, Gyümölcsnektár, Nektár
it: Nettare di frutta
ja: 果肉飲料
lt: Vaisių nektarai, Nektarai
nl: Vruchtennectars, Vruchtennectar
pl: Nektary owocowe, Nektar
pt: Néctares de frutas, néctares
ru: Плодовые нектары, Нектары плодовые

en: Refrigerated fruit nectars
bg: Хладилни плодови нектари
de: Gekühlte Fruchtnektare
es: Néctares de frutas refrigerados
fr: Nectars de fruits réfrigérés
hr: Rashlađeni voćni nektari
hu: Hűtött gyümölcsnektárok
lt: Šaldytos vaisių nektarai
nl: Gekoelde vruchtennectars
ro: Nectare de fructe refrigerate
zh: 冷藏水果花蜜

en: Apple nectars
bg: Нектар от ябълки
de: Apfelnektare
es: Néctares de manzana
fi: omenanektarit
fr: Nectars de pomme, nectar de pommes, nectar de pomme, nectar pomme, nectars pomme
he: מיץ תפוחים, נקטר תפוחים
hr: Nektari od jabuka
hu: Almanektárok
it: Nettare di mela
lt: Obuolių nektarai, Obuolių nektaras
nl: Appelnectars, Appelnectar
pl: Nektary jabłkowe
pt: Néctares de maçã
ru: Нектары яблочные, Яблочные нектары, Нектар яблочный, Яблочный нектар
zh: 苹果花蜜

en: Sparkling apple nectars
de: Sprudelnde Apfelnektare
es: Néctares de manzana con gas
fr: Nectars de pomme pétillants
hr: Pjenušavi nektari od jabuka
nl: Bruisende appelnectars